Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 248.006 is amended to read:
248.006. (1) An affiliation of  electors becomes a major political party in this state and is quali-
fied to make nominations at a primary election when a number of electors equal to  at least [ five]
10 percent of the number of electors registered in this state are  registered as members of the party
not later than the 275th day before the date of a primary  election. An affiliation of electors satis-
fying the requirements of this subsection shall be subject to the  provisions of ORS 248.007 on the
date the Secretary of State determines the registration requirements are satisfied.
(2) The  number of electors described in subsection (1) of this section shall be calculated based
on the number  of electors registered in this state and eligible to vote, as reported on the official
abstracts of the election, at the general  election immediately preceding the deadline specified in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) After an affiliation of electors becomes a major political party  under subsection (1) of this
section, in order to maintain status  as a major political party subject to ORS 248.007, the party must
satisfy the registration requirement  of subsection (1) of this section not later than the 275th day
before each primary election.
(4) An affiliation of electors ceases to be a major political party if the registration requirements
of subsection (1) of this  section are not satisfied by the 275th day before each primary election. The
affiliation of electors ceases to be a major political party on  the date the Secretary of State deter-
mines that the registration requirement is not satisfied.
(5) When an affiliation of electors has not satisfied the registration requirement of subsection
(1) of this section for the first time, at  the request of a representative of the affiliation of electors,
the Secretary of  State shall determine not less than once each month whether at least [ five] 10
percent of the number of eligible electors registered in this state  are registered as members of the
party. After an affiliation of electors has qualified as a major political  party, the Secretary of State
shall determine on  the 271st day before each primary election whether the major political party has
satisfied the registration requirements described in subsection (3) of this section.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 3908 (HB 3908-INTRO) Page 1
Passed by House June 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3908 (HB 3908-INTRO) Page 2